Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2710
Rules and regulations.

The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Perfusion Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 17;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,399.